New York, session 2025-2026, S9046.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 19 of section 378 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph h to read as follows: 3 h. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the 4 construction, repair, alteration, addition, relocation, or change of 5 occupancy or use of any buildings for which a building permit was issued 6 prior to January first, two thousand twenty-seven. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14324-01-5